src-fst-affixes-adjectives.lexc.md
# Livvi adjective inflection


## Temporary lexica

* LEXICON Q_X 

* LEXICON A_ 

## Somewhat open issues

* LEXICON A_TULLUT IS THIS LIVVI? tullut:tullu

* LEXICON A_EX needs to be changed to @exclude=fst

LEXICON A_BAHUV 

LEXICON A_UNDECL undeclinable fin: taipumaton

LEXICON A_IS-N-PL-GEN genitive plural attributes

LEXICON A_IS-N-SG-GEN genitive plural attributes

LEXICON A-DEM_NÄMÄ nämä:nämä



### ONE-SYLLABLE VOWEL-FINAL STEMS ENDING IN LONG VOWEL SEGMENT
LEXICON A_KUU kuu:kuu

LEXICON A_MUA mua:maa

LEXICON A_PIÄ piä:piä


## Ordinary inflection

### TWO-SYLLABLE VOWEL-FINAL STEMS
LEXICON A_HYVÄ hyvä:hyvä
the comparatives and superlatives are supletive

LEXICON A_OZA oza:oza

LEXICON A_SÄYNÄ säynä:säynä

LEXICON A_KALA kala:kala

LEXICON A_KOIVU koivu:koivu

LEXICON A_HERY hery:hery

LEXICON A_LUGU lugu:lugu

LEXICON A_IDY idy:idy




LEXICON A_HÄKKI häkki:häkki

LEXICON A_ARTELI 

LEXICON A_ALUS alus:aluks


LEXICON A_KUURNIS kuurnis:kuurne

LEXICON A_PUHTAHUS puhtahus:puhtahu

LEXICON A_OLUT olut:olu

### TWO-SYLLABLE VOWEL-FINAL STEM WITH UNIQUE +Nom+Sg VOWEL
LEXICON A_PÄIVY päivy:päivä

LEXICON A_MUARJU muarju:muarja


LEXICON A_AKKU akku:akka



LEXICON A_VALGEI valgei:valge

LEXICON A_RAHMANNOI rahmannoi:rahmannoi




LEXICON A_PAGIZII pagizii:pagizi



LEXICON A_KESTÄY kestäy:kestä

### TWO-SYLLABLE VOWEL-FINAL STEMS WITH CONSONANT-FINAL PARTITIVE STEM


### THREE-SYLLABLE VOWEL-FINAL STEMS
LEXICON A_PAREMBI parembi:paremb

LEXICON A_JIÄTÖI jiätöi:jiät
LEXICON A_HUOLETOI huoletoi:huolet
LEXICON A_HUOLETOI/JIÄTÖI huoletoi:huolet

LEXICON A_KARJALAINE karjalaine:karjala

LEXICON A_LIYGILÄINE liygiläine:liygilä

LEXICON A_NAINE naine:nai
LEXICON A_KIELINE kieline:kieli
LEXICON A_NAINE/KIELINE_01 kieline:kieli naine:nai

LEXICON A_TOINE toine:to
LEXICON A_TOINE-PL toine:to

### THREE-SYLLABLE STEMS WITH TWO-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULAR

LEXICON A_MADAL madal:madal

LEXICON A_PIIRAI piirai:piira 

LEXICON A_RAIŠ raiš:ra


LEXICON A_PEREH pereh:pereh

LEXICON A_TULLUH tulluh:tullu

LEXICON A_PESSYH pessyh:pessy

LEXICON A_ARMAS armas:arma

LEXICON A_VARVAS varvas:varva

LEXICON A_TUORES tuores:tuore


LEXICON A_SUARI suari:suar

LEXICON A_KIELI kieli:kiel
LEXICON A_SUARI/KIELI_01 suari:suar

LEXICON A_VUOZI vuozi:vuod

LEXICON A_VEZI vezi:ved

LEXICON A_NIMI nimi:nim

LEXICON A_JÄLGI jälgi:jälg
front vowel
gradation Yes



### TWO-SYLLABLE WORD WITH CONSONANT-FINAL STEM

LEXICON A_VAŽEN važen:važe


LEXICON A_LÄMMIN lämmin:lämbi

LEXICON A_TAIGIN taigin:taigin

LEXICON A_SALBOIN salboin:salboi

LEXICON A_ENIN enin:eni




These cases are symmetrically marked for number
The next two share the same stem vowel





* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/affixes/adjectives.lexc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-olo/blob/main/../src/fst/affixes/adjectives.lexc)</small>
